North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 26A. Repeal of Acts.

§ 113-377.8.
Repeal of certain public, public-local, special and private acts.

The following public, public-local, special and private acts are hereby repealed: Chapter 36 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 113 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 260 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 308 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 326 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 370 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 431 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 435 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 475 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 589 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 673 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 702 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 771 of the Public Laws of 1901; Chapter 131 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 414 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 520 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 631 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 650 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 658 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 668 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 732 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 752 of the Public Laws of 1903; Chapter 86 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 265 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 283 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 351 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 363 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 500 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 560 of the Public Laws of 1905; Chapter 386 of the Public Laws of 1907; Chapter 572 of the Public Laws of 1907; Chapter 690 of the Public Laws of 1907; Chapter 811 of the Public Laws of 1907; Chapter 977 of the Public Laws of 1907; Chapter 426 of the Public Laws of 1909; Chapter 466 of the Public Laws of 1909; Chapter 585 of the Public Laws of 1909; Chapter 755 of the Public Laws of 1909; Chapter 871 of the Public Laws of 1909; Chapter 525 of the Public-Local Laws of 1911; Chapter 547 of the Public-Local Laws of 1911; Chapter 572 of the Public-Local Laws of 1913; Chapter 587 of the Public-Local Laws of 1913; Chapter 402 of the Private Laws of 1913; Chapter 58 of the Public-Local Laws, Extra Session of 1913; Chapter 211 of the Public-Local Laws, Extra Session of 1913; Chapter 30 of the Public Laws of 1915; Chapter 180 of the Public Laws of 1915; Chapter 610 of the Public-Local Laws of 1915; Chapter 599 of the Public-Local Laws of 1917; Chapter 202 of the Public-Local Laws, Extra Session 1920; Chapter 114 of the Public-Local Laws of 1921; Chapter 384 of the Public-Local Laws of 1921; Chapter 432 of the Public-Local Laws of 1921; Chapter 439 of the Public-Local Laws of 1921; Chapter 157 of the Public-Local Laws, Extra Session of 1921; Chapter 130 of the Public-Local Laws of 1923; Chapter 352 of the Public-Local Laws of 1923; Chapter 533 of the Public-Local Laws of 1923; Chapter 548 of the Public-Local Laws of 1923; Chapter 461 of the Public-Local Laws of 1925; Chapter 623 of the Public-Local Laws of 1925; Chapter 228 of the Public-Local Laws of 1927; Chapter 208 of the Public-Local Laws of 1929; Chapter 42 of the Public Laws of 1933; Chapter 51 of the Public Laws of 1933; Chapter 241 of the Public-Local Laws of 1933; Chapter 575 of the Public-Local Laws of 1933; Chapter 365 of the Public-Local Laws of 1935; Chapter 368 of the Public-Local Laws of 1935; Chapter 509 of the Public-Local Laws of 1935; Chapter 513 of the Public-Local Laws of 1935; Chapter 352 of the Public Laws of 1937; Chapter 266 of the Public-Local Laws of 1937; Chapter 632 of the Public-Local Laws of 1937; Chapter 265 of the Public Laws of 1939; Chapter 138 of the Public-Local Laws of 1939; Chapter 179 of the Public-Local Laws of 1939; Chapter 335 of the Public-Local Laws of 1941; Chapter 221 of the Special Laws of 1947; Chapter 485 of the Special Laws of 1947; Chapter 1017 of the Special Laws of 1947; Chapter 1031 of the Special Laws of 1949.

Provided that any public, public-local, special or private law herein repealed may be covered by a regulation of the Board of Conservation and Development to effectuate the same privileges or protection therein provided upon the petition of either the representative or senator from that county or district filed within six months from the date of ratification.

History.

1951, c. 1045, s. 2.